New Jersey, session 221, S192.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section, Roth contribution option means an employee retirement plan that permits employees to make after-tax contributions to a retirement account through salary deductions in a manner consistent with the federal Internal Revenue Code and regulations. b.    Any municipality, county, or an authority created by one or more counties or municipalities that establishes a deferred compensation plan pursuant to P.L.1977, c.381 (C.43:15B-1 et seq.) and the federal Internal Revenue Code and regulations shall ensure that a Roth contribution option is also offered to participants of the plan.  The provisions of P.L.1977, c.381 (C.43:15B-1 et seq.) shall be applicable to the extent necessary for the implementation of this section. 2.  a.  As used in this section, Roth contribution option means an employee retirement plan established pursuant to the federal Internal Revenue Code and regulations that permits employees to make after-tax contributions to a retirement account through salary deductions in a manner consistent with the federal Internal Revenue Code and regulations. b.    The New Jersey State Employees Deferred Compensation Board in the Department of the Treasury shall ensure that the New Jersey State Employees Deferred Compensation Plan established pursuant to P.L.1978, c.39 (C.52:18A-163 et seq.) and the federal Internal Revenue Code and regulations also offers a Roth contribution option to participants of the plan.  The provisions of P.L.1978, c.39 (C.52:18A-163 et seq.) shall be applicable to the extent necessary for the implementation of this section. 3.  a.  As used in this section, Roth contribution option means an employee retirement plan that permits employees to make after-tax contributions to a retirement account through salary deductions in a manner consistent with the federal Internal Revenue Code and regulations. b.    Any board of education that establishes a deferred compensation plan pursuant to N.J.S.18A:66-127 through 129, inclusive, shall ensure that a Roth contribution option is also offered to participants of the plan.  The provisions of N.J.S.18A:66-127 through 129, inclusive, shall be applicable to the extent necessary for the implementation of this section. 4.    This act shall take effect 60 days following the date of enactment.